Arkansas, session 2025, SB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 19, Subchapter 5, is
repealed.
2-19-501. Definition.
“One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer” shall be
defined as and include the following:
(1)(A) One hundred percent (100%) organic fertilizer — Materials
derived from either plant or animal products containing one (1) or more
elements other than carbon, hydrogen, and oxygen which are essential for
plant growth.
(B) These materials may be subjected to biological
degradation processes under conditions of drying, composting, enzymatic or
anaerobic/aerobic bacterial action or any combination of these.
(C) These materials shall not be mixed with synthetic
materials;
(2) One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizer shall
be processed from only one hundred percent (100%) animal substrate. No other
organic or inorganic, natural or synthetic, additives shall be used during
processing and no fortification may be used;
*CRH132*
02/13/2025 8:56:24 AM CRH132

SB224
(3) One hundred percent (100%) natural organic fertilizers shall
contain as a guaranteed analysis not less than: nitrogen (N), four percent
(4.0%); phosphoric acid (P2O5), two percent (2.0%); and potash (K2O), four
percent (4.0%); and
(4) Determination of the guaranteed analysis will be according
to methods adopted by the AOAC International. (Fertilizers and Materials
Containing Large Quantities of Organic Matter; 12th edition, With Following
Improvements.).

2-19-502. Regulation and supervision — Fees and penalties — Guarantee
of elements.
(a) The State Plant Board shall have the authority to regulate and
supervise the manufacture and sale of one hundred percent (100%) natural
organic fertilizer, including the setting and collecting of reasonable fees
for sampling and analyzing the fertilizer and registering manufacturers, and
shall adopt and promulgate such rules and penalties consistent with this
subchapter, and § 2-19-202, as may be necessary.
(b) The fees and penalties set and collected by the board under this
section shall not exceed like fees and penalties set for other types of
fertilizers.
(c) When any reference or claim is made on the label for secondary or
minor plant nutrients, a specific guarantee of the specific elements
contained shall be given in the guaranteed analysis.

2-19-503. Exemptions.
This subchapter shall not affect the private sale of unprocessed animal
litter, nor shall the State Plant Board regulate the private sale of
unprocessed animal litter which is not sold as one hundred percent (100%)
natural organic fertilizer as defined by this subchapter.







02/13/2025 8:56:24 AM CRH132